District of Columbia statutes.
26-320

Formal investigations.

Whenever it appears that an individual or entity licensed or required to be licensed under this chapter has violated or is violating any law, agreement, order, rule, or regulation or has engaged in an unsafe or unsound practice, the Superintendent [Commissioner] may issue an order to conduct a formal investigation of such person. The Superintendent [Commissioner] may cause any investigation, or portion of such investigation, to be conducted by a District or federal law enforcement agency by making the request for assistance from such agency.

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-111, § 21, 45 DCR 1782
1981 Ed., § 26-1120.